Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1073.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-812, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-812. Applicability of traffic laws to bicycle riders A. A person riding a bicycle on a roadway or on a shoulder adjoining a roadway is granted all of the rights and is subject to all of the duties applicable to the driver of a vehicle by this chapter and chapters 4 and 5 of this title, except special rules in this article and except provisions of this chapter and chapters 4 and 5 of this title that by their nature can have no application. B. A person riding a bicycle: 1. may not exceed a speed that is reasonable and prudent under currently EXISTING conditions on a bicycle or multiuse path. 2. may not exceed a speed of fifteen miles per hour on a sidewalk. 3. may not exceed five miles per hour over the speed of any person the person riding the bicycle is passing. 4. If possible, shall provide an audible warning before passing any other person. c. The local authority with jurisdiction over a bicycle or multiuse path may limit the speed of a bicycle to a lesser speed than the requirements of subsection B of this section. B. D. If a person is found responsible for a civil traffic violation resulting from operating a bicycle: 1. A department or agency of this state may not consider the violation for the purpose of determining whether the person's driver license should be suspended or revoked.  A court may not transmit an abstract of the record of the violation to the department of transportation. 2. An insurer may not consider the violation as a moving traffic violation against the person for the purpose of establishing rates for motor vehicle liability insurance or determining the insurability of the person.  An insurer may not cancel or refuse to renew an insurance policy because of the violation. 3. A report may not be made under section 28-1559, subsection B. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 28-819, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-819. Electric bicycles; electric standup scooters; speed limit A. An operator of an electric bicycle or an electric standup scooter is granted all the rights and privileges and is subject to all of the duties of a person riding a bicycle. Except as otherwise provided in this section or as otherwise regulated by a local authority, an electric bicycle or an electric standup scooter is subject to the same provisions of this title as a bicycle. B. An electric bicycle or an electric standup scooter is not subject to the provisions of this title relating to certificates of title, registration, vehicle license tax, driver licenses or vehicle insurance. C. Beginning January 1, 2019, Manufacturers and distributors of electric bicycles shall apply a label that is permanently affixed, in a prominent location, to each electric bicycle.  The label shall contain the classification number, top assisted speed and motor wattage of the electric bicycle and shall be printed in at least nine-point type. D. A class 1 electric bicycle, a class 2 electric bicycle or an electric standup scooter may be used on bicycle and multiuse paths.  A local authority or agency of this state having jurisdiction over a bicycle or multiuse path may prohibit the operation of a class 1 electric bicycle, class 2 electric bicycle or electric standup scooter on the path. E. A class 3 electric bicycle may not be operated on a bicycle or multiuse path unless it is within or adjacent to a highway or roadway or unless the local authority or agency of this state having jurisdiction over the path allows the operation. F. An electric standup scooter must have a unique identification that consists of letters or numbers, or both, and that is visible from a distance of at least five feet. The identification: 1. May not be obscured by branding or other markings. 2. Shall be used in this state to identify the electric standup scooter. This paragraph applies to all persons, including local authorities. G. A person operating an electric bicycle, electric standup scooter, electric miniature scooter, electric personal assistive mobility device or motorized skateboard: 1. May not exceed fifteen miles per hour while in use on a sidewalk. 2. May not exceed a speed that is reasonable and prudent on a bicycle or multiuse path. 3. May not exceed five miles per hour over the speed of any person when passing another person on a sidewalk or a bicycle or multiuse path. 4. If possible, shall provide an audible warning to any person the operator is passing on a sidewalk or a bicycle or multiuse path. H. The local authority with jurisdiction over a bicycle or multiuse path may limit the speed of an electric bicycle, electric standup scooter, electric miniature scooter, electric personal assistive mobility device or motorized skateboard to a lesser speed than the requirements of subsection g of this section. END_STATUTE